Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.06.250

Certificates.

(1) Shares may, but need not, be represented by certificates. Unless this title or another statute expressly provides otherwise, the rights and obligations of shareholders are identical regardless of whether their shares are represented by certificates.

(2) At a minimum each share certificate must state on its face:

(a) The name of the issuing corporation and that it is organized under the laws of this state;

(b) The name of the person to whom issued; and

(c) The number and class of shares and the designation of the series, if any, the certificate represents.

(3) If the issuing corporation is authorized to issue different classes of shares or different series within a class, the designations, relative rights, preferences, and limitations applicable to each class and the variations in rights, preferences, and limitations determined for each series, and the authority of the board of directors to determine variations for future series, must be summarized on the front or back of each certificate. Alternatively, each certificate may state conspicuously on its front or back that the corporation will furnish the shareholder this information without charge on request in writing.

(4) Each share certificate (a) must be executed by two officers designated in the bylaws or by the board of directors and (b) may bear the corporate seal or its facsimile.

(5) If the person who executed a share certificate no longer holds office when the certificate is issued, the certificate is nevertheless valid.

[ 2020 c 57 s 44; 1989 c 165 s 53.]